Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 1
PROGRAMS AND SERVICES

Editor's note:

This part 1 was added with relocations in 2010 containing provisions of part 2 of article 1 of title 25. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this part 1, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

27-80-101. Definitions.

As used in this article 80, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Behavioral health administration" or "BHA" means the behavioral health administration established in section 27-50-102.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of the behavioral health administration.

(2.3) "Department" means the department of human services created in section 26-1-105.

(2.6) "Designated service area" means the geographical substate planning area specified by the commissioner to be served by a behavioral health administrative services organization, as described in section 27-80-107.

Repealed.

"Fetal alcohol spectrum disorder" or "FASD" means a continuum of permanent birth defects caused by maternal consumption of alcohol during pregnancy. "FASD" includes, but is not limited to, fetal alcohol syndrome.

(4.7) Repealed.

"Public program" means a program concerning the problems of alcohol or drug abuse sponsored by a county, district, or municipal public health agency, county department of human or social services, court, probation department, law enforcement agency, school, school system, board of cooperative services, Indian tribal reservation, or state agency. "Public program" includes any alcohol or drug abuse treatment program required as a condition of probation under part 2 of article 11 of title 16, any alcohol or drug abuse program administered by the division of adult parole under article 2 of title 17, any community correctional facility or program administered under article 27 of title 17, and any alcohol or drug abuse treatment program administered by the division of youth services under title 19.

and (7) Repealed.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 721, § 2, effective April 29; (5) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2091, § 85, effective August 11.

L. 2011:

(7) repealed, (HB 11-1144), ch. 65, p. 173, § 3, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

IP and (2) amended, (4.7) added, and (6) repealed, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1353, § 253, effective May 25; IP and (5) amended, (HB 17-1329), ch. 381, p. 1985, § 66, effective June 6.

L. 2018:

(5) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 453, § 140, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(1) and (2) amended, (2.3) and (2.6) added, and (3) and (4.7) repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1549, § 143, effective July 1; (2.6) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1597, § 244, effective August 10.

27-80-102. Duties of the office of behavioral health.

The office of behavioral health is a type 2 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105, and is responsible for the powers, duties, and functions relating to the alcohol and drug driving safety program specified in section 42-4-1301.3. The office of behavioral health shall formulate a comprehensive state plan for substance use disorder treatment programs. The office of behavioral health shall submit the state plan to the governor and, upon the governor's approval, submit it to the appropriate United States agency for review and approval. The state plan must include, but not be limited to:

A survey of the need for the prevention and treatment of alcohol and drug abuse, including a survey of the health facilities needed to provide services and a plan for the development and distribution of facilities and programs throughout the state;

A plan for programs to educate the public in the problems of alcohol and drug abuse;

A survey of the need for trained teachers, health professionals, and others involved in the prevention and treatment of alcohol and drug abuse and the rehabilitation of abusers, and a plan to provide the necessary training for such persons;

Provisions for the periodic review and updating of the state plan, which shall take place at least annually.

The department, acting by and through the office of behavioral health, is designated as the sole state agency for the supervision of the administration of the state plan.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 722, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

IP(1) and (2) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1353, § 254, effective May 25.

L. 2021:

(3) added, (SB 21-239), ch. 266, p. 1548, § 4, effective June 18.

L. 2022:

IP(1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3379, § 78, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-202 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

(2) For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 21-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

27-80-103. Grants for public programs.

The BHA may make grants, from money appropriated by the general assembly for purposes of this section or available from any other governmental or private source, to approved public programs.

A public program may provide, but need not be limited to, any of the following:

Acute medical services, including emergency services and detoxification;

Case finding, diagnosis, treatment, counseling, individual or group psychotherapy, after-care treatment, and other rehabilitation services;

Education and counseling regarding the use and abuse of alcohol and drugs;

Programs for prevention of alcohol and drug abuse administered by the department of public health and environment;

Training of teachers, health professionals, and others in the field of alcohol and drug abuse and addiction counseling;

Coordination of existing services and the development of other needed services through demonstration and evaluation projects; or

Services to pregnant women who are alcohol and drug dependent through demonstration and evaluation projects.

In approving any public program, the BHA shall take into consideration the following:

The community need for the public program;

The range of services to be provided;

The integration of the public program with, and the participation of, other public and nongovernmental agencies, organizations, institutions, and individuals, and their services and facilities, if any, that are available to assist the public program;

The adequacy of the public program to accomplish its purposes; and

Any other information the BHA deems necessary.

Applications for grants made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section are made to the BHA, on forms furnished by the BHA, and must contain any information the BHA requires. Wherever possible, the BHA shall give priority to public programs that are community-based and include services to children and juveniles as well as adults, that provide a comprehensive range of services, and that evidence a high degree of community support, either financial or in the furnishing of services and facilities, or both.

Whenever the BHA or any department or agency of the state has money available from any source for public programs, the BHA, department, or agency is authorized to distribute the money in accordance with the state plan and to make reasonable rules for the administration of the public programs.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 722, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

(1), IP(3), (3)(e), (4), and (5) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1354, § 255, effective May 25.

L. 2022:

(1), (2)(d), IP(3), (3)(e), (4), and (5) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1550, § 145, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-203 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-80-104. Cancellation of grants.

The BHA may cancel a grant for any public program for any of the following reasons:

There is no longer a need for the public program.

Funds for the public program are not available.

The public program does not meet the standards or requirements adopted by the BHA or does not conform to the comprehensive state plan for substance use disorder treatment programs.

Before canceling a grant for the reasons set forth in subsection (1)(c) of this section, the BHA shall notify the person or agency in charge of the public program of the deficiency in the program, and the person or agency must be given a reasonable amount of time to correct the deficiency.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 723, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

IP(1), (1)(c), and (2) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1354, § 256, effective May 25.

L. 2022:

IP(1), (1)(c), and (2) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1551, § 146, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-204 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-80-105. Annual distribution of funds.

Funds for public programs shall be distributed annually, if available.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 724, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-205 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-80-106. Purchase of prevention and treatment services.

Using money appropriated for purposes of this section or available from any other governmental or private source, the BHA may purchase services for prevention or for the treatment of alcohol and drug abuse or substance use disorders or both types of services on a contract basis from any tribal nation or any public or private agency, organization, or institution approved by the BHA. The services purchased may be any of those provided through a public program, as set forth in section 27-80-103 (2). In contracting for services, the BHA shall attempt to obtain services that are in addition to, and not a duplication of, existing available services or services that are of a pilot or demonstration nature. An agency operating a public program may also purchase services on a contract basis.

In addition to the services purchased pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, using money appropriated for purposes of this section or available from any other governmental or private source, the BHA may purchase services for the treatment of alcohol and drug abuse or substance use disorders on a contract basis from a behavioral health administrative services organization for a designated service area as set forth in section 27-80-107. A public or private agency, organization, or institution approved by the BHA through the process set forth in section 27-80-107 may be designated as a behavioral health administrative services organization.

Behavioral health administrative services organizations receiving money pursuant to this subsection (2) shall comply with all relevant provisions of and rules promulgated pursuant to this article 80.

Repealed.

As of July 1, 2022, the department of public health and environment is the state department responsible for the administration of prevention services pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 724, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1355, § 257, effective May 25.

L. 2019:

(3) added, (SB 19-228), ch. 276, p. 2605, § 9, effective May 23.

L. 2022:

(1) and (2)(a) amended and (4) added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1551, § 147, effective July 1; (2)(a) and (2)(b) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1597, § 245, effective August 10.

27-80-107. Designation of managed service organizations - purchase of services - revocation of designation.

The director of the office of behavioral health shall establish designated service areas to provide substance use disorder treatment and recovery services in a particular geographical region of the state.

To be selected as a designated managed service organization to provide services in a particular designated service area, a private corporation; for profit or not for profit; or a public agency, organization, or institution shall apply to the office of behavioral health for a designation in the form and manner specified by the executive director or the executive director's designee. The designation process is in lieu of a competitive bid process pursuant to the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24. The director of the office of behavioral health shall make the designation based on factors established by the executive director or the executive director's designee. The factors for designation established by the executive director or the executive director's designee include the following:

Whether the managed service organization has experience working with public treatment agencies and collaborating with other public agencies;

Whether the managed service organization has experience working with publicly funded clients, including expertise in treating priority populations designated by the office of behavioral health;

Whether the managed service organization has offices in and provides services in the substate planning area or is willing to relocate to the substate planning area;

Whether the managed service organization has experience using the cost-share principles used by the office of behavioral health in its contracts with providers and is willing to cost-share;

Whether the managed service organization has developed an effective, integrated information and fiscal reporting system and has experience working with and is able to comply with state and federal reporting requirements;

Whether the managed service organization has experience engaging in a clinical quality improvement process; and

Whether the managed service organization has experience with public funding requirements and state contracting requirements.

(2.5) (a) On or before January 1, 2023, in order to promote transparency and accountability, the office of behavioral health shall require each managed service organization that has twenty-five percent or more ownership by providers of behavioral health services to comply with the following conflict of interest policies:

Providers who have ownership or board membership in a managed service organization shall not have control, influence, or decision-making authority in how funding is distributed to any provider or the establishment of provider networks.

The office of behavioral health shall quarterly review a managed service organization's funding allocation to ensure that all providers are being equally considered for funding. The office of behavioral health is authorized to review any other pertinent information to ensure the managed service organization is meeting state and federal rules and regulations and is not inappropriately giving preference to providers with ownership or board membership.

An employee of a contracted provider of a managed service organization shall not also be an employee of the managed service organization unless the employee is a medical director for the managed service organization. If the medical director is also an employee of a provider that has board membership or ownership in the managed service organization, the managed service organization shall develop policies, approved by the commissioner of the behavioral health administration, to mitigate any conflict of interest the medical director may have.

A managed service organization's board shall not have more than fifty percent of contracted providers as board members, and the managed service organization is encouraged to have a community member on the managed service organization's board.

If the office is unable to contract with a managed service organization that meets the requirements of this subsection (2.5), the office may designate another existing managed service organization to temporarily provide the services for that region, for up to one year, pending designation of a new managed service organization. If the office is unable to designate a new managed service organization, the temporary managed service organization may continue to provide the regional substance use disorder services on a year by year basis.

As used in this subsection (2.5), unless the context otherwise requires:

"Medical director" means a physician who oversees the medical care and other designated care and services in a managed service organization. The medical director may be responsible for helping to develop clinical quality management and utilization management.

"Ownership" means an individual who is a legal proprietor of an organization, including a provider or individual who owns assets of an organization, or has a financial stake, interest, or governance role in the managed service organization.

The designation of a managed service organization by the director of the office of behavioral health, as described in subsection (2) of this section, is an initial decision of the department which may be reviewed by the executive director in accordance with the provisions of section 24-4-105. Review by the executive director in accordance with section 24-4-105 constitutes final agency action for purposes of judicial review.

The terms and conditions for providing substance use disorder treatment and recovery services must be specified in the contract entered into between the office of behavioral health and the designated managed service organization. Contracts entered into between the office of behavioral health and the designated managed service organization must include terms and conditions prohibiting a designated managed service organization contracted treatment provider from denying or prohibiting access to medication-assisted treatment, as defined in section 23-21-803, for a substance use disorder.

Contracts entered into between the office of behavioral health and the designated managed service organization must include terms and conditions that outline the expectations for the designated managed service organization to invest in the state's recovery services infrastructure, which include peer-run recovery support services and specialized services for underserved populations. Investments are based on available appropriations.

The contract may include a provisional designation for ninety days. At the conclusion of the ninety-day provisional period, the director of the office of behavioral health may choose to revoke the contract or, subject to meeting the terms and conditions specified in the contract, may choose to extend the contract for a stated time period.

A managed service organization that is designated to serve a designated service area may subcontract with a network of service providers to provide treatment and recovery services for alcohol and drug abuse and substance use disorders within the particular designated service area.

The director of the office of behavioral health may revoke the designation of a designated managed service organization upon finding that the managed service organization is in violation of the performance of the provisions of or rules promulgated pursuant to this article 80. The revocation must conform to the provisions and procedures specified in article 4 of title 24, and occur only after notice and an opportunity for a hearing is provided as specified in article 4 of title 24. A hearing to revoke a designation as a designated managed service organization constitutes final agency action for purposes of judicial review.

Once a designation has been revoked pursuant to subsection (7)(a) of this section, the director of the office of behavioral health may designate one or more service providers to provide the treatment services pending designation of a new designated managed service organization or may enter into contracts with subcontractors to provide the treatment services.

From time to time, the director of the office of behavioral health may solicit applications from applicants for managed service organization designation to provide substance use disorder treatment and recovery services for a specified planning area or areas.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 724, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

(1), IP(2), (2)(b), (2)(d), (3), (4), (5), (6), and (7) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1355, § 258, effective May 25.

L. 2020:

(4) amended, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1390, § 2, effective July 13.

L. 2021:

(1), (4), (6), and (7)(c) amended, (HB 21-1021), ch. 256, p. 1510, § 3, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(2.5) added, (SB 22-106), ch. 196, p. 1312, § 3, effective May 20.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-206.5 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-80-107.5. Increasing access to effective substance use disorder services act - managed service organizations - substance use disorder services - assessment - community action plan - allocations - reporting requirements - evaluation.

The short title of this section is the "Increasing Access to Effective Substance Use Disorder Services Act".

On or before February 1, 2017, each behavioral health administrative services organization designated pursuant to section 27-80-107 shall assess the sufficiency of substance use disorder services within its geographic region for adolescents ages seventeen and younger, young adults ages eighteen through twenty-five, pregnant women, women who are postpartum and parenting, and other adults who are in need of such services. During the community assessment process, each behavioral health administrative services organization shall seek input and information from appropriate behavioral health entities, county departments of human or social services, local public health agencies, substance use disorder treatment providers, law enforcement agencies, probation departments, organizations that serve veterans or homeless individuals, and other relevant stakeholders. The community assessment must include an analysis of existing funding and resources within the community to provide a continuum of substance use disorder services, including prevention, intervention, treatment, and recovery support services, for adolescents ages seventeen and younger, young adults ages eighteen through twenty-five, pregnant women, women who are postpartum and parenting, and other adults who are in need of such services.

On or before March 1, 2017, each behavioral health administrative services organization that has completed a community assessment pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall prepare and submit in electronic format to the BHA and the department of health care policy and financing a community action plan to increase access to effective substance use disorder services, referred to in this section as the "community action plan". The community action plan must summarize the results of the community assessment and include a description of how the behavioral health administrative services organization will utilize its allocation of funding from the marijuana tax cash fund created in section 39-28.8-501 to address the most critical service gaps in its geographic region and a timeline for implementation of the community action plan.

A behavioral health administrative services organization may periodically update its community action plan to reflect changes in community needs and priorities. Any such updated plan must be submitted in electronic format to the BHA and the department of health care policy and financing.

On or before May 1, 2017, the BHA shall post the community action plans from the behavioral health administrative services organizations developed pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section on its website. On or before May 1, 2017, the BHA shall submit a report summarizing all of the community action plans received from the behavioral health administrative services organizations to the joint budget committee, the health and human services committee of the senate, and the public and behavioral health and human services committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees. The BHA shall post on its website any updated community action plans received pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this section.

Repealed.

On July 1, 2017, and on every July 1 thereafter, the BHA shall disburse to each behavioral health administrative services organization that has submitted a community action plan one hundred percent of the behavioral health administrative services organization's allocation from the money appropriated from the marijuana tax cash fund.

It is the intent of the general assembly that each behavioral health administrative services organization use money allocated to it from the marijuana tax cash fund to cover expenditures for substance use disorder services that are not otherwise covered by public or private insurance. Each behavioral health administrative services organization may use its allocation from the marijuana tax cash fund to implement its community action plan, including expenditures for substance use disorder services and for any start-up costs or other expenses necessary to increase capacity to provide such services. A behavioral health administrative services organization must spend its allocation in the state fiscal year in which it is received or in the next state fiscal year thereafter. If there is any money from the allocation remaining after the second state fiscal year, then the behavioral health administrative services organization shall return the money to the BHA. If an enhanced residential and inpatient substance use disorder treatment and medical detoxification services benefit becomes available under the Colorado medical assistance program, behavioral health administrative services organizations shall determine to what extent money allocated from the marijuana tax cash fund may be used to assist in providing substance use disorder treatment, including residential and inpatient substance use disorder treatment and medical detoxification services, if those services are not otherwise covered by public or private insurance.

Repealed.

On or before September 1, 2017, and on or before each September 1 thereafter, each behavioral health administrative services organization shall submit an annual report to the BHA, the joint budget committee, the health and human services committee of the senate, and the public and behavioral health and human services committee of the house of representatives, or their successor committees, concerning the amount and purpose of actual expenditures made using money from the marijuana tax cash fund in the previous state fiscal year. The report must contain a description of the impact of the expenditures on addressing the needs that were identified in the initial and any subsequent community assessments and action plans developed pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, as well as any other requirements established for the contents of the report by the BHA.

A behavioral health administrative services organization shall provide the BHA with information about actual expenditures as required by the BHA.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the BHA shall report on outcomes related to the implementation of this section as part of its annual "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" hearing required by section 2-7-203, beginning with the hearing that precedes the 2019 legislative session.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (SB 16-202), ch. 209, p. 748, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2017:

IP(5)(c) amended, (SB 17-234), ch. 154, p. 524, § 17, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(4)(c), (4)(d)(I), (5)(a), (5)(b), IP(5)(c), and (5)(c)(II) amended and (7) added, (HB 18-1172), ch. 110, p. 801, § 1, effective April 9; (4)(c) amended, (HB 18-1136), ch. 373, p. 2271, § 3, effective June 5.

L. 2022:

(3), (4)(b), (4)(c), (5)(a), (5)(b), and (7) amended, and (4)(a), (4)(d), (5)(c), and (6) repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1553, § 149, effective July 1; (2), (3), (4)(b), (4)(c), (5)(a), and (5)(b) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1598, § 246, effective August 10.

27-80-107.7. Increase synthetic opiate treatment - report.

On or before January 1, 2023, each managed service organization designated pursuant to section 27-80-107 shall evaluate the current supply and necessary demand within its region for:

The number of medication-assisted treatment providers employed by the managed service organization that are trained to provide medication-assisted treatment to a person who has consumed synthetic opiates;

Ambulatory withdrawal management and medical withdrawal management specific to synthetic opiates;

The provision of recovery services at public high schools; and

The provision of recovery residences, as defined in section 25-1.5-108.5.

In its hearing for the 2024 legislative session, the department shall include as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" hearing required by section 2-7-203, the managed service organizations' findings pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1326), ch. 225, p. 1650, § 28, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1326 stating the purpose of, and the provision directing legislative staff agencies to conduct, a post-enactment review pursuant to § 2-2-1201 scheduled in 2025, see sections 1 and 55 of chapter 225, Session Laws of Colorado 2022. To obtain a copy of the review, once completed, go to "Legislative Resources and Requirements" on the Colorado General Assembly's website.

27-80-107.8. Withdrawal management and crisis service expansion - appropriation.

On or before January 1, 2023, each managed service organization shall:

Contract to provide short-term residential placement for withdrawal management, crisis stabilization, or medication-assisted treatment for persons in immediate need of detoxification and stabilization services, with a provider that is licensed by the state of Colorado to provide those services. The managed service organization is encouraged to contract with crisis service providers that have existing contracts with administrative services organizations for the purpose of providing crisis stabilization services for individuals who need substance use services.

Develop a payment schedule that includes admission and service rates from the managed service organization to the provider and organizational funding for training and coordination with first responders or referring entities; and

Provide training to, and ongoing coordination with, first responders or referring entities concerning the available services to be utilized in lieu of arrest and transport to jail, to the greatest extent possible.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate ten million dollars to the behavioral health administration to be distributed to managed service organizations for the purpose of implementing this section. Any unexpended money remaining at the end of the 2022-23 state fiscal year from this appropriation:

Does not revert to the general fund or any other fund;

May be used by the behavioral health administration in the 2023-24 or 2024-25 state fiscal years without further appropriation; and

Must not be used for any other purpose other than the purposes set forth in this section.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1326), ch. 225, p. 1658, § 37, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Section 57(1)(b) of chapter 225 (HB 22-1326), Session Laws of Colorado 2022, provides that the act adding this section takes effect only if HB 22-1278 becomes law and takes effect either upon the effective date of HB 22-1278 or HB 22-1326, whichever is later. HB 22-1278 became law, and both bills have an effective date of July 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1326 stating the purpose of, and the provision directing legislative staff agencies to conduct, a post-enactment review pursuant to § 2-2-1201 scheduled in 2025, see sections 1 and 55 of chapter 225, Session Laws of Colorado 2022. To obtain a copy of the review, once completed, go to "Legislative Resources and Requirements" on the Colorado General Assembly's website.

27-80-108. Rules.

The state board of human services, created in section 26-1-107, has the power to promulgate rules governing the provisions of this article 80. The rules may include, but are not limited to:

Requirements for the operation of a public program, including record keeping and data compilation;

Conditions that may be imposed on a public program for the program to maintain grant eligibility;

Requirements for public and private agencies, organizations, and institutions from which the office of behavioral health may purchase services pursuant to section 27-80-106 (1), which requirements must include prohibiting the purchase of services from entities that deny or prohibit access to medical services or substance use disorder treatment and services to persons who are participating in prescribed medication-assisted treatment, as defined in section 23-21-803, for a substance use disorder;

Requirements for managed service organizations that are designated by the director of the office of behavioral health to provide services in a designated service area pursuant to section 27-80-106 (2);

Standards that addiction counselors must meet to participate in public programs or to provide purchased services and certification requirements necessary to be certified by the director of the division of professions and occupations, pursuant to part 8 of article 245 of title 12;

On or before March 1, 2022, standards that addiction counselors must meet to participate in public programs or to provide purchased services and education requirements necessary to be licensed by the director of the division of professions and occupations, pursuant to part 8 of article 245 of title 12;

Any rules that are necessary to carry out the purposes of the treatment program for high-risk pregnant women created in section 27-80-112.

In the rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (1)(e) of this section, the state board of human services shall include education requirements for certified addiction technicians, certified addiction specialists, and licensed addiction counselors.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 726, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1357, § 259, effective May 25.

L. 2019:

(1)(e) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1714, § 200, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(1)(c) amended, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1390, § 3, effective July 13; (2) added, (HB 20-1206), ch. 304, p. 1543, § 41, effective July 14.

L. 2021:

(1)(e.5) added and (2) amended, (HB 21-1305), ch. 399, p. 2649, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-207 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-80-109. Coordination of state and federal funds and programs.

Requests for state appropriations for substance use disorder treatment programs must be submitted to the BHA and the office of state planning and budgeting on dates specified by the BHA, consistent with requirements and procedures of the office of state planning and budgeting. After studying each request, the BHA shall make a report with its comments and recommendations, including priorities for appropriations and a statement as to whether the requested appropriation would be consistent with the comprehensive state plan for substance use disorder treatment programs. The BHA shall submit its reports to the governor, the office of state planning and budgeting, and the joint budget committee, together with all pertinent material on which the report's recommendations are based.

The BHA shall also review applications for federal grants for substance use disorder treatment programs submitted by any department or agency of state government; political subdivision of the state; Indian tribal reservation; or other public or private agency, organization, or institution. The BHA shall transmit to the division of planning and to the appropriate United States agency its comments and recommendations, together with a statement as to whether the grant would be consistent with the comprehensive state plan for substance use disorder treatment programs.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 727, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1357, § 260, effective May 25.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1557, § 151, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-209 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-80-110. Reports. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 727, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1358, § 261, effective May 25; entire section repealed, (SB 17-234), ch. 154, p. 524, § 18, effective August 9.

27-80-111. Counselor training - fund created - rules.

The commissioner shall establish by rule fees to be charged for addiction counselor training. The amount assessed must be sufficient to cover a portion of the costs of administering the training, and the money collected must be deposited in the addiction counselor training fund. Additional funding may be obtained from general, cash, or federal funds otherwise appropriated to the BHA.

There is created in the office of the state treasurer the addiction counselor training fund, referred to in this section as the "fund". Money collected pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited in the fund. The money in the fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the BHA for the administration of addiction counselor training requirements established by rules of the state board of human services pursuant to section 27-80-108 (1)(e). Money in the fund at the end of the fiscal year must remain in the fund and not revert to the general fund.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 727, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1358, § 262, effective May 25.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1557, § 152, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-1-211 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.